Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-448
Assessment of benefits to highways and public property; payment.

The assessment for benefits to public highways and streets and other public property that may have been benefited, shall be paid out of such fund of the county, city, village or other public corporation involved, as the officers thereof may deem most available for such purpose.

Laws 1911, c. 145, § 1, p. 486;

R.S.1913, § 1912;

C.S.1922, § 1860;

C.S.1929, § 31-548;

R.S.1943, § 31-448.